Vermont, session 2025-2026, H656.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 1051 is amended to read:
§ 1051. SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE AND PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE
OF THE SENATE; COMPENSATION AND EXPENSE
REIMBURSEMENT
* * *
(b) If the Speaker of the House substantiates that the Speaker’s total
household income for any month during the legislative session is less than the
Speaker’s median monthly income prior to serving in the General Assembly,
then the Speaker is entitled to receive a supplemental payment from the
General Assembly in the following month if the shortfall is attributable to the
Speaker’s service in the General Assembly. The amount of the supplemental
payment under this section shall be the difference between the Speaker’s actual
total household income for the applicable month and the Speaker’s median
monthly income prior to serving in the General Assembly.
(c) If the President Pro Tempore of the Senate substantiates that the
President’s total household income for any month during the legislative session
is less than the President’s median monthly income prior to serving in the
General Assembly, then the President is entitled to receive a supplemental
payment from the General Assembly in the following month if the shortfall is
attributable to the President’s service in the General Assembly. The amount of
VT LEG #386225 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.656
2026 Page 3 of 10
the supplemental payment under this section shall be the difference between
the President’s actual total household income for the applicable month and the
President’s median monthly income prior to serving in the General Assembly.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 1052 is amended to read:
§ 1052. MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; COMPENSATION
AND EXPENSE REIMBURSEMENT
(a)(1) Each member of the General Assembly, other than the Speaker of the
House and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, is entitled to a weekly
salary of $589.00 for the 2005 Biennial Session and thereafter, provided that,
beginning on January 1, 2007, the weekly compensation shall be adjusted
annually thereafter by the cost of living adjustment negotiated for State
employees under the most recent collective bargaining agreement, except that,
beginning on July 1, 2021, and annually thereafter on January 1, the weekly
compensation shall be adjusted consistent with the compensation increases
provided to other constitutional officers. The salary of members shall be paid
in biweekly installments.
* * *
(3) If a member substantiates that the member’s total household income
for any month during the legislative session is less than the member’s median
monthly income prior to serving in the General Assembly, then the member is
entitled to receive a supplemental payment from the General Assembly in the
VT LEG #386225 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.656
2026 Page 4 of 10
following month if the shortfall is attributable to the member’s service in the
General Assembly. The amount of the supplemental payment under this
section shall be the difference between the member’s actual total household
income for the applicable month and the member’s median monthly income
prior to serving in the General Assembly.
* * *
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 631 is amended to read:
§ 631. GROUP INSURANCE FOR STATE EMPLOYEES; SALARY
DEDUCTIONS FOR INSURANCE, SAVINGS PLANS, AND
CREDIT UNIONS
(a)(1) The Secretary of Administration may contract on behalf of the State
with any insurance company or nonprofit association doing business in this
State to secure the benefits of franchise or group insurance. The terms of
coverage under the policy shall be determined under section 904 of this title,
but it may include:
(A) life, disability, health, and accident insurance and benefits for
any class or classes of State employees; and
(B) hospital, surgical, and medical benefits for any class or classes of
State employees or for those employees and any class or classes of their
dependents.
VT LEG #386225 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.656
2026 Page 5 of 10
(2)(A)(i) As used in this section, the term “employees” includes any
class or classes of elected or appointed officials, State’s Attorneys, sheriffs,
employees of State’s Attorneys’ offices whose compensation is administered
through the State of Vermont payroll system, except contractual and temporary
employees, and deputy sheriffs paid by the State of Vermont pursuant to 24
V.S.A. § 290(b). The term “employees” shall does not include members of the
General Assembly as such, any person rendering service on a retainer or fee
basis, members of boards or commissions, or persons other than employees of
the Vermont Historical Society, the Vermont Film Corporation, the Vermont
State Employees’ Credit Union, Vermont State Employees’ Association, and
the Vermont Council on the Arts, whose compensation for service is not paid
from the State Treasury, or any elected or appointed official unless the except
as specifically provided pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i). The term
“employees” includes employees of the Vermont Historical Society, the
Vermont State Employees’ Credit Union, the Vermont State Employees’
Association, the Vermont Council on the Arts, and any elected or appointed
official who is actively engaged in and devoting substantially full-time to the
conduct of the business of the official’s public office. The term “employees”
also includes members of the General Assembly as set forth in subdivision (iv)
of this subdivision (a)(2)(A).
* * *
VT LEG #386225 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.656
2026 Page 6 of 10
(iv) For purposes of group hospital-surgical-medical expense
insurance, the term “employees” includes members of the General Assembly.
(B)(i) The premiums for extending insurance coverage to employees
shall be paid in full by the Vermont Historical Society, the Vermont Film
Corporation, the Vermont State Employees’ Association, the Vermont State
Employees’ Credit Union, the Vermont Council on the Arts, or their respective
retirees. Nothing herein creates a legal obligation on the part of the State of
Vermont to pay any portion of the premiums required to extend insurance
coverage to this group of employees.
(ii) Members of the General Assembly shall be required to pay the
same portion of the premium for group hospital-surgical-medical expense
insurance as is required of employees of the Executive Branch.
* * *
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 500 is amended to read:
§ 500. DEFINED CONTRIBUTION RETIREMENT PLAN
(a) The State Treasurer shall offer a retirement plan for State employees
who are not members of the classified system and for members of the General
Assembly. The Plan shall qualify as a defined contribution plan under the U.S.
Internal Revenue Code, as amended. Participation in such plan shall be in lieu
of the retirement plans established under chapter 16 of this title.
VT LEG #386225 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.656
2026 Page 7 of 10
(b)(1) Employees who are not members of the classified system who are
first employed by the State on and after January 1, 1999, and would otherwise
be members of Group A, B, C, D, F, or G of the Vermont State Retirement
System shall be eligible to participate in the Defined Contribution Retirement
Plan.
(2) Members of the General Assembly who are elected or appointed to
serve in the General Assembly for the 2027–2028 biennium and after shall be
eligible to participate in the Defined Contribution Retirement Plan.
(c) Employees and members of the General Assembly who elect to
participate in the Defined Contribution Retirement Plan shall contribute at the
rate of 2.85 percent of the employee’s or member’s compensation for each
payroll period. The State shall contribute to each employee’s or member’s
account at the rate of seven percent of the employee’s or member’s
compensation for each payroll period. Employees and members may make
additional after-tax contributions to the plan, provided that total annual
contributions by an employee and employer or member and by the State in any
calendar year shall not exceed the maximum permitted for such plans under the
U.S. Internal Revenue Code.
(d) Election to participate in the Defined Contribution Retirement Plan is
irrevocable, unless one of the following applies:
VT LEG #386225 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.656
2026 Page 8 of 10
(1) the The employee or member becomes a classified employee and
elects to transfer his or her the employee’s or member’s membership and the
full actuarial value of the accrued benefit calculated on a cost neutral basis to
the Vermont State Retirement System; or.
(2) the The employee or member is appointed to a position that is
eligible for membership in the Group D plan. Within 60 days of after
appointment, the employee or member may choose to participate in the Group
D plan and cease participation in the defined contribution plan Defined
Contribution Retirement Plan. Upon an election to participate in the Group D
plan, the State Treasurer shall apply the funds accumulated in the employee’s
or member’s defined contribution account toward purchasing retirement credit
in the Group D plan by first applying the funds toward purchasing any Group
D eligible credit earned from the date of the judicial appointment and then
applying the funds toward purchasing credit in the retirement group plan or
plans for which the employee or member would have formerly been eligible.
(e) An employee or member who elects to participate in the Defined
Contribution Retirement Plan shall become vested in the Plan after completion
of one year and 11 months of creditable service as a State employee or service
as a member of the General Assembly.
(f) An employee or member who has elected to participate in the defined
contribution plan Defined Contribution Retirement Plan and, after having
VT LEG #386225 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.656
2026 Page 9 of 10
accrued a minimum of five years of service, becomes disabled as determined
by the Social Security Administration or by a State-purchased disability
insurance policy while currently employed by the State or serving as a member
of the General Assembly, shall be entitled to continue the same health and
dental benefits that are available to members of the Vermont State Retirement
System who qualify for disability retirement benefits.
(g) Upon retirement, employees and members who elect to participate in
the Defined Contribution Retirement Plan shall be entitled to the same life,
dental, and health insurance benefits available to members of the Vermont
State Retirement System.
(h) The State Treasurer shall certify to the Governor or Governor-Elect a
statement of the percentage of the payroll of all participating employees and
members sufficient to fund all operating expenses of the defined contribution
retirement plan Defined Contribution Retirement Plan and all contributions of
the State that will become due and payable during the next biennium.
Contributions by the State shall be charged to the departmental appropriation
from which the employees’ and members’ salaries are paid and shall be
included in each departmental budgetary request.
(i) The Plan shall be administered by the State Treasurer who shall adopt
rules necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this chapter.
VT LEG #386225 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.656
2026 Page 10 of 10
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 4 (3 V.S.A. § 500) shall take effect on passage.
(b) All other sections shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #386225 v.1